Utah statutes.
19-1-102.   Purposes.
The purpose of this title is to:
(1)  clarify the powers and duties of the Department of Environmental Quality
in relationship to local health departments;
(2)  provide effective, coordinated management of state environmental
concerns;
(3)  safeguard public health and quality of life by protecting and improving
environmental quality while considering the benefits to public health, the
impacts on economic development, property, wildlife, tourism, business,
agriculture, forests, and other interests, and the costs to the public and to
industry; and
(4) (a)  strengthen local health departments' environmental programs;
(b)  build consensus among the public, industry, and local governments in
developing environmental protection goals; and
(c)  appropriately balance the need for environmental protection with the need
for economic and industrial development.
